test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_long_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aasâm
    saađđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saađâm
    caaccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: caasâm
    caappâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: caavâm
    coohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: coovâm
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: coojâm
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: caja
    coommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: coomâm
    coommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cama
    faallâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fáálá
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haavâm
    hoohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hoovâm
    hoohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huáhá
    huunnjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hunjá
    iiŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iŋá
    jaammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jaamâm
    jaannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jááná
    juuccâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juusâi
    juuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juuvâm
    juullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juulâm
    juurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juurâm
    juurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jorá
    kaarrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaarâm
    kaattâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaađâm
    keehâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: keevâm
    keerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiärá
    keevvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiävá
    kiiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kicá
    kiihâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiivâm
    kiimmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kimá
    kiinnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiinâm
    kooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koosâm
    kooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaca
    koorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koorâm
    koorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kara
    kuullâđ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulâm
    kuullâđ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kulá
    kuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuvâm
    kuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kopá
    kuussâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuusâm
    kuuđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuđâm
    kuuđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kođá
    laannjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laanjâm
    laannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laanâm
    laannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lááná
    laađđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: laađâm
    loommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loomâm
    loommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lama
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuvâm
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lohá
    luuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuvâm
    luuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lopá
    maannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maanâm
    maannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mááná
    maaššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: maašâm
    maaššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: máášá
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moonâm
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ibárdâs
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mana
    moorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moorâm
    moorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muárá
    muullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: muulâm
    muullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: molá
    muuttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: motá
    naaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naajâm
    naaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: náájá
    naallâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: naalâm
    niirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: niirâm
    niirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nirá
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaavâm
    njaammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaamâm
    njeeijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njeejâm
    njiihâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiivâm
    njiittâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njiiđâm
    njooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njoosâm
    njooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaca
    njoollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njoolâm
    njoollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njala
    njoommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njoomâm
    njoommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njama
    njuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njuuvâm
    njuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njopá
    nooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noojâm
    noollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: noolâm
    noollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nala
    nuuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuuvâm
    nuuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nohá
    nuurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nuurâm
    paaŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: paaŋâm
    peerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peerâm
    peerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piärá
    peessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peesâm
    peessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juolgij
    peessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piäsá
    peettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: peeđâm
    peettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piätá
    piiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: piisâm
    piiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: picá
    poollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poolâm
    poollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pala
    poossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poosâm
    puuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puuvâm
    puuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pohá
    puunnjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puunjâm
    puunnjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ponjá
    raaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: raajâm
    raaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ráájá
    raattâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ráátá
    reettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riätá
    riiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riišâm
    rooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roosâm
    rooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruácá
    roohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roovâm
    roossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roosâm
    roossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rasa
    roottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roođâm
    roottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rata
    saallâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saalâm
    saarrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saarâm
    saaččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saajâm
    saađđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saađâm
    seellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siälá
    siillâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siilâm
    siittâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sitá
    skaaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skáájá
    skiippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skiivâm
    skiippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skipá
    soohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soovâm
    soohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saha
    soollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soolâm
    soollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sala
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soovâm
    sooppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suápá
    soottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soođâm
    soottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suátá
    sooŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sooŋâm
    sooŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saŋa
    spiiđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spiđá
    stookkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stoohâm
    stookkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuáká
    stuullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuulâm
    stuullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stulá
    stuuččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuujâm
    suuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuvâm
    suuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suhá
    suuijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suujâm
    suuijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sojá
    suunnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suunâm
    suunnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soná
    suuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suuvâm
    suuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sopá
    suurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: suurâm
    suurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sorá
    taammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taamâm
    taammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: táámá
    tiippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tipá
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toovâm
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huámmášumijd
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meerhâ
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taha
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toolâm
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: syeligâsâst
    toollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuálá
    toommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: toomâm
    toommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuámá
    tuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: topá
    tuuttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuuđâm
    tuuttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: totá
    tuuŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toŋá
    uuccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: uusâm
    uuccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ocá
    uussâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: osá
    vaannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaanâm
    vaannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vááná
    vaarrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaarâm
    vaarrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: váárá
    vaattâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaađâm
    veeppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veevâm
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veerâm
    veerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viärá
    veeđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veeđâm
    viillâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viilâm
    viillâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vilá
    viippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viivâm
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viirâm
    viirrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: virá
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viišâm
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: višá
    vooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: voojâm
    vooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaja
    voonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: voonâm
    voonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vana
    čaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaavâm
    čaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čááhá
    šaammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šaamâm
    šaammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šáámá
    šaavvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šaavâm
    čaaŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čaaŋâm
    čaaŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čááŋá
    škaaijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: škaajâm
    šloottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šloođâm
    šloottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šluátá
    šnjuuđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šnjuuđâm
    čoollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoolâm
    šoollâđ+v1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šoolâm
    šoollâđ+v1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šala
    čoonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čoonâm
    čoonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čana
    čuuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čuuvâm
    šuuvvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuvá
